Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-78] Security for funds deposited by
the corporation. The corporation may by resolution provide that all moneys
deposited by it shall be secured by:

(1) Any securities by which funds deposited by the
director of finance may be legally secured as provided in section 38-3; or

(2) An undertaking with sureties as are approved by
the corporation faithfully to keep and pay over upon the order of the
corporation any deposits and agreed interest thereon, and all banks and trust
companies are authorized to give any such security for those deposits. [L 2006,
c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next